Vermont, session 2025-2026, H829.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. § 2464f is added to read:
§ 2464f. ROBOCALLS; ARTIFICIAL VOICE; NOTIFICATION
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
VT LEG #385457 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.829
2026 Page 2 of 4
(1) “Artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine-based
system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit
objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can
influence physical or virtual environments.
(2) “Artificial voice” means a voice that is generated or significantly
altered using artificial intelligence.
(3) “Automatic dialing-announcing device” means any automatic
equipment that incorporates a storage capability of telephone numbers to be
called or a random or sequential number generator capable of producing
numbers to be called and the capability, working alone or in conjunction with
other equipment, to disseminate a prerecorded message to the telephone
number called.
(b) Notice. Whenever a telephone call is placed through the use of an
automatic dialing-announcing device, the device may be operated only after an
unrecorded, natural voice announcement has been made to the person called by
the person calling. The announcement shall:
(1) state the nature of the call and the name, address, and telephone
number of the business or organization being represented, if any;
(2) inquire as to whether the person called consents to hear the
prerecorded message of the person calling; and
VT LEG #385457 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.829
2026 Page 3 of 4
(3) inform the person called if the prerecorded message uses an artificial
voice.
(c) Disconnection. The person calling, as described in subsection (a) of
this section, shall disconnect the automatic dialing-announcing device from the
telephone line upon the termination of the call by either the person calling or
the person called.
(d) Civil violation.
(1) A violation of this section constitutes a violation of section 2453 of
this title.
(2) Each prohibited telephone call constitutes a separate violation under
this subsection.
(3)(A) A person who receives a telephone call in violation of this
section may bring an action in Superior Court for damages or a civil penalty,
injunctive relief, punitive damages in the case of a willful violation, and
reasonable costs and attorney’s fees.
(B) The court may issue an award for the greater of a person’s
damages or a civil penalty of $500.00 for a first violation and $1,000.00 for
each subsequent violation.
(e) Criminal penalties.
VT LEG #385457 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.829
2026 Page 4 of 4
(1) A person who commits a knowing and willful violation of this
section shall be imprisoned for not more than 90 days or fined not more than
$1,000.00 per violation, or both.
(2) Each telephone call constitutes a separate violation under this
subsection.
(f) Enforcement. The Attorney General shall exercise the Attorney
General’s authority and discretion to work cooperatively with other state and
federal government entities to identify callers who initiate robocalls to
consumers in violation of this section and to enforce the provisions of this
section regardless of the location of the caller.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385457 v.2